Arkansas, session 2025, HB1780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 13-4-409(a), concerning items in possession
of a sheriff's office pursuant to a criminal investigation or court case, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) If an item is in the possession of a county sheriff's office
pursuant to a felony criminal investigation, it shall be retained until the
applicable statute of limitation for the most serious possible crime to which
it could be connected has lapsed unless the item is:
(1) Released by an order of the court; or
(2) Released by the prosecuting attorney because there will be
no prosecution pursuant to the felony criminal investigation.

/s/Gazaway




*CEB179*
04-02-2025 10:19:34 CEB179